Massachusetts, session 194th, H454.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (a) of Section 28A of Chapter 140D of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraphs (1) and (2) and inserting in
place thereof the following 2 paragraphs: -
(1) With respect to sales transactions nothing in this section shall prohibit any seller from
offering a discount on any transaction to induce payment by cash, check, debit card or similar
means rather than by charge card or credit card. No seller may offer any such discount unless
such seller posts a notice disclosing such discount. Such seller shall clearly and conspicuously
post such notice on the seller’s premises for in-person transactions, shall post such notice on the
Internet website or digital payment application before completing any online transaction or
transaction that is processed by way of digital payment application, and shall verbally provide
such notice before completing any oral transaction, including, but not limited to, and telephonic
transaction.
of 2

(2) No seller in any sales transaction may impose a surcharge on a buyer who elects to
use any method of payment, including but not limited to, cash, check, a credit card, or electronic
means.
of 2